Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-766
Sickness and accident insurance; wrongful delivery of policy; violations; penalties; appeal.

Any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation who or which willfully delivers or issues for delivery in this state any policy of sickness and accident insurance on a form which has been disapproved by the Director of Insurance or willfully violates any provision of sections 44-709 to 44-767 or an order of the director made in accordance with sections 44-710 to 44-767 shall forfeit to the people of the state a sum not to exceed one hundred dollars for each such violation which may be recovered by a civil action. The director may after notice and hearing revoke the license of an insurer or agent for any such willful violation. Any person aggrieved by any action of the Director of Insurance may appeal. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1947, c. 164, § 18, p. 471;

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 20, p. 660;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 25, p. 1278;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 55;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 156;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 228.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.